Ohio, session 136, HB746.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 124.826 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 124.826. (A) As used in this section, "political subdivision" means a county, township, municipal corporation, or other body corporate and politic that is responsible for governmental activities in a geographic area smaller than the state. (B)(1) A political subdivision may elect to participate in any health, medical, hospital, dental, surgical, or vision benefit the director of administrative services contracts for under section 124.82 of the Revised Code or otherwise provides for the benefit of state employees who are paid directly by warrant of the director of budget and management. A political subdivision that elects to participate in a benefit under this section shall notify the director of that election. (2) A political subdivision that has elected to participate in a benefit under this section may cease participation by notifying the director. The political subdivision's election to cease participation is effective on the first day of the next benefit year. A political subdivision that ceases participation may subsequently elect to participate in a benefit by complying with division (B)(1) of this section. (C) An employee of a political subdivision that makes an election to participate in a benefit under division (B)(1) of this section may enroll in a benefit by filing the election form developed by the director under division (D) of this section with the employee's political subdivision. The political subdivision shall forward the election form to the director. (D) The director shall do all of the following: (1) Prescribe procedures, in consultation with the director of budget and management, to administer benefits for political subdivision employees under this section; (2) Develop the required election forms for employees to enroll, disenroll, or re-enroll in benefits under this section; (3) Provide the election forms developed under this division to each political subdivision that elects to participate in a benefit under this section; (4) Notify a political subdivision when its employee has enrolled, disenrolled, or re-enrolled in benefits under this section. (E) The director of administrative services shall offer to political subdivision employees who enroll in benefits under this section the same cost-sharing arrangements, coverage options, contribution rates, and enrollment periods as are offered to state employees who are paid directly by warrant of the director of budget and management under section 124.82 of the Revised Code. All or any portion of the cost, premium, or charge for the coverage under this section may be paid in such manner or combination of manners as the director determines and may include the proration of health care costs, premiums, or charges for part-time employees. (F) To assist the director of administrative services in administering benefits for political subdivision employees under this section, each political subdivision that elects to participate in a benefit under this section shall coordinate with the director to facilitate enrollment and provide any information, including employee data, that the director requires to the director or a designated third-party administrator. (G) Nothing in this section requires a political subdivision to elect coverage for the political subdivision's employees under this section or prohibits a political subdivision from offering similar coverage options under any other type of health benefit plan. (H) The director of administrative services shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement this section and to address both of the following: (1) The determination of the contributions and cost-sharing arrangements for coverage under this section; (2) The administration of claims and benefits for political subdivision employees under this section.